Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2323
Nurse practitioner; actions not prohibited.

Nothing in the Nurse Practitioner Practice Act shall prohibit a nurse practitioner from consulting or collaborating with and referring patients to health care providers not included in the nurse practitioner's transition-to-practice agreement.

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 34;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 50;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 63;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1723.03;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 815;

Laws 2015, LB107, § 7.